de: Spielzeuge & Spiele > Spielzeuge > Sportspielzeuge: American Football-Spielzeug; Baseball für Kinder; Basketball für Kinder; Bumerangs; Bowling für Kinder; Fingerboards & Fingerboard-Sets; Angelspielzeug; Fitness-Spielzeug; Frisbees; Footbags; Golf für Kinder; Hockey für Kinder; Kinderspielbälle; Spielzeugschläger; Fußball-Spielzeug; Tischtennis-Spielzeug
en: Toys & Games > Toys > Sports Toys: American Football Toys; Baseball Toys; Basketball Toys; Boomerangs; Bowling Toys; Fingerboards & Fingerboard Sets; Fishing Toys; Fitness Toys; Flying Discs; Footbags; Golf Toys; Hockey Toys; Playground Balls; Racquet Sport Toys; Soccer Toys; Table Tennis Toys
tr: Oyuncaklar ve Oyunlar > Oyuncaklar > Spor Oyuncakları: Amerikan Futbolu Oyuncukları; Oyuncak Beyzbol Topu; Oyuncak Basketbol Topu; Bumeranglar; Bovling Oyuncakları; Parmak Kaykayları ve Parmak Kaykayı Setleri; Balık Tutma Oyunu; Fitness Oyuncakları; Frizbiler; Ayak topları; Golf Oyuncakları; Hokey Oyuncakları; Oyun Alanı Topları; Raket Sporu Oyuncakları; Futbol oyuncakları; Masa tenisi oyuncakları
ro-RO: Jucării și jocuri > Jucării > Jucării sportive: Jucării fotbal american; Jucării baseball; Jucării baschet; Bumeranguri; Jucării bowling; Grifuri și seturi grif; Jucării pescuit; Jucării fitness; Discuri zburătoare; Mingi moi; Jucării golf; Jucării hochei; Mingi pentru teren de joacă; Jucării sportive cu rachetă; Jucării de fotbal; Jucării tip ping-pong
sl-SI: Igrače in igre > Igrače > Športne igrače: Igrače za ameriški nogomet; Igrače za baseball; Igrače za košarko; Bumerangi; Igrače za bowling; Prstne rolke in kompleti prstnih rolk; Igrače za ribolov; Igrače za fitnes; Frizbiji; Vrečke za brcanje; Igrače za golf; Igrače za hokej; Žoge za igrišče; Igrače za šport z loparji; Nogometne igrače; Igrače za namizni tenis
sk-SK: Hračky a hry > Hračky > Športové hračky: Hračky na americký futbal; Baseballové hračky; Basketbalové hračky; Bumerangy; Bowlingové hračky; Fingerboardy a súpravy fingerboardov; Rybárske hračky; Fitness hračky; Lietajúce disky; Footbagy; Golfové hračky; Hokejové hračky; Hracie lopty; Detské rakety; Futbalové hračky; Hračkársky stolný tenis
ja: おもちゃ・ゲーム > おもちゃ > スポーツ玩具: アメリカンフットボールのおもちゃ; おもちゃの野球用品; おもちゃのバスケットボール用品; ブーメラン; おもちゃのボーリング用品; フィンガーボード・フィンガーボードセット; おもちゃの釣り道具; フィットネス玩具; フライングディスク; フットバッグ; おもちゃのゴルフ用品; おもちゃのホッケー用品; 遊戯用ボール; おもちゃの各種ラケット; サッカーおもちゃ; 卓球おもちゃ
nb: Leker og spill > Leker > Sportsleker: Leker for for amerikansk fotball; Baseballeker; Basketballeker; Boomeranger; Bowlingleker; Fingerbrett og fingerbrettsett; Fiskeleker; Treningsleker; Sendeplater; Fotposer; Golfleker; Hockeyleker; Lekekasseballer; Racketsportleker; Fotball-leker; Bordtennisleker
pt-PT: Brinquedos e jogos > Brinquedos > Brinquedos de desporto: Brinquedos de Futebol Americano; Brinquedos de basebol; Brinquedos de basquetebol; Boomerangs; Brinquedos de bowling; Fingerboards e conjuntos de fingerboard; Brinquedos de pesca; Brinquedos de fitness; Discos voadores; Footbags; Brinquedos de golfe; Brinquedos de hóquei; Bolas de recreio; Brinquedos de desportos com raquetes; Brinquedos de futebol; Brinquedos de ténis de mesa
fr: Jeux et jouets > Jouets > Jouets de sport: Jouets de football américain; Jouets de base-ball; Jouets de basket-ball; Boomerangs; Jouets de bowling; Fingerboards et coffrets de fingerboards; Jouets de pêche; Jouets de fitness; Frisbees; Footbags; Jouets de golf; Jouets de hockey; Ballons pour jeux de plein air; Jeux de raquettes; Jouets de football; Jouets de tennis de table
hr-HR: Igračke i igre > Igračke > Sportske igračke: Igračke za američki nogomet; Igračke za bejzbol; Igračke za košarku; Bumeranzi; Igračke za kuglanje; Fingerboardi i setovi fingerboarda; Igračke za ribolov; Igračke za fitness; Leteći diskovi; Footbag loptice; Igračke za golf; Igračke za hokej; Lopte za igralište; Igračke za sportove s reketom; Igračke za nogomet; Igračke za stolni tenis
es: Juegos y juguetes > Juguetes > Juguetes de deporte: Juguetes de fútbol americano; Pelota de béisbol de juguete; Pelota de baloncesto de juguete; Bumeranes; Bolos de juguete; Mini-tablas y conjuntos de mini-tablas; Juguete de pesca; Juguetes de actividad física; Discos voladores; Pelotas de footbag; Equipo de golf de juguete; Equipo de hockey de juguete; Pelotas para jugar; Juguetes de deportes con raqueta; Juguetes de fútbol; Juguetes de tenis de mesa
bg-BG: Играчки и игри > Играчки > Спортни играчки: Играчки за американски футбол; Играчки за бейзбол; Играчки за баскетбол; Бумеранги; Играчки за боулинг; Скейтборд за пръсти и комплекти; Играчки за риболов; Фитнес играчки; Летящи дискове; Хекове; Играчки за голф; Играчки за хокей; Топки за детска площадка; Спортни играчки с ракети; Футболни играчки; Играчки за тенис на маса
el: Παιχνίδια > Παιχνίδια (Toys) > Αθλητικά παιχνίδια: Παιχνίδια αμερικανικού ποδοσφαίρου; Παιχνίδια μπέιζμπολ; Παιχνίδια μπάσκετ; Μπούμερανγκ; Παιχνίδια μπόουλινγκ; Τροχοσανίδες μικρών διαστάσεων (Fingerboards) & σετ τροχοσανίδων μικρών διαστάσεων; Παιχνίδια ψαρέματος; Παιχνίδια γυμναστικής; Ιπτάμενοι δίσκοι; Σάκοι ποδιών (hacky sack); Παιχνίδια γκολφ; Παιχνίδια χόκεϊ; Μπάλες για παιδικές χαρές; Παιχνίδια με ρακέτες; Παιχνίδια ποδοσφαίρου; Παιχνίδια επιτραπέζιας αντισφαίρισης
fi: Lelut ja pelit > Lelut > Urheilulelut: Lelut, amerikkalainen jalkapallo; Baseball-lelut; Koripallolelut; Bumerangit; Keilailulelut; Sormilaudat ja sormilautasetit; Kalastuslelut; Kuntoilulelut; Frisbeet; Footbagit; Golflelut; Jääkiekkolelut; Leikkipallot; Mailapelilelut; Jalkapallolelut; Pöytätennislelut
pl: Gry i zabawki > Zabawki > Zabawki sportowe: Zabawki do futbolu amerykańskiego; Baseball dla dzieci; Koszykówka dla dzieci; Bumerangi; Kręgle dla dzieci; Fingerboardy i zestawy; Zabawkowe zestawy wędkarskie; Zabawki fitness; Latające talerze; Zośki; Golf dla dzieci; Hokej dla dzieci; Piłki zabawkowe; Zabawki związane ze sportami rakietowymi; Zabawki piłkarskie; Zabawki do tenisa stołowego
zh-TW: 玩具和遊戲 > 玩具 > 運動類玩具: 美式足球玩具; 棒球玩具; 玩具籃球; 迴力鏢; 保齡球玩具; 手指滑板組; 釣魚玩具; 健身玩具; 飛盤; 玩具沙包; 高爾夫玩具; 遊戲用曲棍球具; 遊戲用球; 球拍運動玩具; 足球玩具; 桌球玩具
th: ของเล่นและเกม > ของเล่น > ของเล่นกีฬา: ของเล่นอเมริกันฟุตบอล; เบสบอลของเล่น; บาสเกตบอลของเล่น; บูมเมอแรง; โบว์ลิ่งของเล่น; ฟิงเกอร์บอร์ดและชุดฟิงเกอร์บอร์ด; ของเล่นตกปลา; ของเล่นฟิตเนส; จานร่อน; ลูกถุงถั่ว; ชุดกอล์ฟของเล่น; ฮอกกี้ของเล่น; ลูกบอลเด็กเล่น; ของเล่นกีฬาแร็กเกต; ของเล่นฟุตบอล; ของเล่นเทเบิลเทนนิส
nl: Speelgoed en spellen > Speelgoed > Sportspeelgoed: American Football speelgoed; Honkbalspeelgoed; Basketbalspeelgoed; Boemerangs; Bowlingspeelgoed; Vingerskateboard en -skateboardsets; Speelgoed - vissen; Fitnessspeeltjes; Frisbees; Footbags; Golfspeelgoed; IJshockeyspeelgoed; Speelballen; Racketspeelgoed; Voetbalspeelgoed; Tafeltennisspeelgoed
da: Legetøj og spil > Legetøj > Sportslegetøj: Amerikansk fodbold – legetøj; Legetøjsbaseball; Legetøjsbasketball; Boomeranger; Legetøjsbowling; Fingerskateboards og sæt med fingerskateboards; Fiskespil; Fitnesslegetøj; Frisbees; Hacky sack; Legetøjsgolf; Legetøjshockey; Legepladsbolde; Legetøjsketsjersport; Fodboldlegetøj; Bordtennislegetøj
cs: Hračky a hry > Hračky > Sportovní hračky: Hračky spojené s americkým fotbalem; Baseballové hračky; Basketbalové hračky; Bumerangy; Bowlingové hračky; Fingerboardy a sady; Dětské rybářské hry; Fitness hračky; Létající talíře; Kopací váčky; Golfové hračky; Hokejové hračky; Dětské míče; Rakety na hraní; Fotbalové hračky; Hračky na stolní tenis
lt-LT: Žaislai ir žaidimai > Žaislai > Sportiniai žaislai: Amerikietiško futbolo žaislai; Beisbolo žaislai; Krepšinio žaislai; Bumerangai; Boulingo žaislai; Žaislinės riedlentės ir riedlenčių rinkiniai; Žvejybos žaislai; Sveikatingumo žaislai; Mėtomi diskai; Futbego kamuoliukai; Golfo žaislai; Ledo ritulio žaislai; Žaidimų aikštelės kamuoliai; Rakečių sporto žaislai; Futbolo žaislai; Stalo teniso žaislai
it: Giochi e giocattoli > Giocattoli > Giocattoli sportivi: Giocattoli da football americano; Giocattoli baseball; Giocattoli basket; Boomerang; Giocattoli bowling; Fingerboard e set appositi; Giocattoli da pesca; Giocattoli fitness; Frisbee; Footbag; Giocattoli golf; Giocattoli hockey; Palle per parco giochi; Giochi di racchetta; Giocattoli a tema calcio; Giocattoli per ping pong
hu: Játékok és játékszerek > Játékok > Sportjátékok: Amerikaifutball-játékok; Baseballjátékok; Kosárlabdajátékok; Bumerángok; Bowlingjátékok; Fogólapok és fogólapkészletek; Horgászjátékok; Fitneszjátékok; Repülő korongok; Lábzsákok; Golfjátékok; Jégkorongjátékok; Játszótéri labdák; Ütős sportjátékok; Focis játékok; Asztalitenisz-játékok
pt-BR: Brinquedos e jogos > Brinquedos > Brinquedos esportivos: Brinquedos de futebol americano; Beisebol de brinquedo; Basquete de brinquedo; Bumerangues; Boliche de brinquedo; Skates de dedo e conjuntos de skates de dedo; Brinquedos de pesca; Aparelhos de exercício de brinquedo; Freesbies; Footbags; Golfe de brinquedo; Mesa de hockey; Bolas de playground; Brinquedos para esportes de raquete; Brinquedos de futebol; Brinquedos de tênis de mesa
vi: Đồ chơi & Trò chơi > Đồ chơi > Đồ chơi thể thao: Đồ chơi bóng bầu dục Mỹ; Đồ chơi bóng chày; Đồ chơi bóng rổ trong nhà; Boomerang; Đồ chơi bowling; Ván trượt bằng ngón tay; Đồ chơi câu cá; Đồ chơi rèn luyện sức khỏe; Đĩa bay; Túi nhỏ đựng ruột mềm; Bộ đồ chơi đánh gôn; Đồ chơi khúc côn cầu; Bóng chơi; Đồ chơi thể thao dùng vợt; Đồ chơi bóng đá; Đồ chơi bóng bàn
ko: 장난감/게임 > 장난감 > 스포츠 장난감: 미식축구 완구; 야구 장난감; 농구 장난감; 부메랑; 볼링 장난감; 미니어처 보드/미니어처 보드 세트; 낚시놀이 완구; 피트니스 장난감; 원반; 풋백; 골프 장난감; 하키 장난감; 놀이용 공; 라켓 스포츠 장난감; 축구 장난감; 탁구 장난감
sv: Leksaker och spel > Leksaker > Sportleksaker: Amerikansk fotboll leksaker; Leksaksbaseboll; Leksaksbasketboll; Bumeranger; Leksaksbowling; Fingerboards och fingerboardsset; Fiskespel; Motionsleksaker; Frisbees; Fotpåsar; Leksaksgolf; Leksakshockey; Bollar; Racketsportsleksaker; Fotbollsleksaker; Bordtennisleksaker
zh-CN: 玩具/游戏 > 玩具 > 运动玩具: 美式橄榄球玩具; 玩具棒球; 篮球玩具; 回力镖; 保龄球玩具; 手指滑板/手指滑板套件; 钓鱼玩具; 健身玩具; 飞盘; 花式沙包; 高尔夫玩具; 玩具曲棍球; 游乐场用球; 小球类运动玩具; 足球玩具; 乒乓球玩具
ru: Игрушки и игры > Игрушки > Спортивные игры: Игровые наборы для американского футбола; Игровые наборы для бейсбола; Игровые наборы для баскетбола; Бумеранги; Игровые наборы для боулинга; Фингерборды и наборы для фингербордов; Игровые наборы для рыбалки; Фитнес-инвентарь для детей; Фрисби; Футбэги; Игровые наборы для гольфа; Игровые наборы для хоккея; Мячи; Игровые наборы с ракетками; Футбольные игрушки; Игрушки для настольного тенниса